Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 20 Interlocal Cooperation Act
25-20-306. General powers of public body.

In addition to exercising the powers set forth elsewhere in this subchapter, and unless its certificate of incorporation or interlocal agreement provides otherwise, each public body created under this subchapter shall have the power to:

Have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate;

Maintain such offices as it may deem appropriate;

Execute and perform contracts;

Sue and be sued;

Apply for and receive permits, licenses, certificates, and approvals as may be necessary and own and operate facilities in accordance therewith;

Employ the services of all personnel necessary to its operations and, in connection therewith, adopt and implement such healthcare, disability, bonus, retirement, and other employee benefit plans as the board of commissioners shall deem appropriate;

Employ the services of professionals;

Purchase insurance, maintain reserves for self-insurance, and become self-insured for the payment of compensation under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq., by compliance with the requirements of § 11-9-404(a)(2), provided that deposit of an indemnity bond, letter of credit, or securities shall not be required;

Purchase, receive, own, hold, improve, use, lease, sell, convey, exchange, transfer, assign, mortgage, pledge, and otherwise acquire, dispose of, and deal with real and personal property and any legal or equitable interest therein in its own name;

Apply for, receive, and use loans, grants, taxes, donations, and contributions from any public agency or other lawful source, including any proceeds from the sale of bonds;

Borrow money on a secured or unsecured basis, and in connection therewith, issue bonds, promissory notes, or other evidence of indebtedness and make and deliver indentures, mortgages, pledges, security agreements, financing statements, and other instruments encumbering assets of the public body;

Pay reasonable franchise fees, make payments in lieu of taxes, or otherwise make payments to the participating public agencies in such amounts as may be required or permitted by the participating public agencies;

Exercise such other powers, privileges, and authorities as the participating public agencies shall have delegated to the public body by their interlocal agreement, subject to any restrictions imposed thereon by the interlocal agreement or applicable law;

Have such other and further powers relating to the ownership and operation of a water system, a wastewater system, and a storm water system as are now by law given to the governing body of any participating public agency and do any and all other acts and things necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of, and to exercise the powers granted to, the public body by this subchapter;

Own and operate, or operate on behalf of a municipality, county, corporation, organization, other public body, or entity authorized by law, any one (1) or more of the following:

A storm water system;

A water system; or

A wastewater system;

Purchase goods and services under applicable law for the public body; and

Purchase professional services under § 19-11-801 et seq. or by any method of competitive bidding including without limitation reverse auctions.

A public body created under this subchapter shall constitute a separate legal entity, but to the extent provided by state law or set forth in the certificate of incorporation of the public body or the interlocal agreement of the participating public agencies, shall be subject to the further supervision or regulation of, or require the further approval or consent of, any participating public agency.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (a)(15) through (18).

The 2019 amendment substituted “a water system, a wastewater system, and a storm water system” for “waterworks systems” in (a)(14); in the introductory language of (a)(15), inserted “or operate on behalf of”, deleted “wastewater system that the public body acquires from a” preceding “municipality”, and substituted “authorized by law, any one (1) or more of the following” for “from which the public body simultaneously acquires or previously acquired a water system”; added (a)(15)(A) through (C); and deleted former (a)(16) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

Unless the interlocal agreement provides otherwise, a public body created under this subchapter shall have full authority to fix, charge, and collect and from time to time change the rates for water, wastewater service, storm water service, and other goods and services provided by the public body.

A public body shall have a reasonable time after its creation or after its expansion by the addition of a new participating public agency to equalize any differentials in rates among similarly situated classes of customers.

It shall be a complete defense to any suit or claim based on the charging of differential rates for similarly situated classes of customers that:

Within one (1) year of the creation or expansion of the public body, an independent expert completes a study of rates charged customers that shows a differential in rates among similarly situated classes of customers located within the jurisdictions of the participating public agencies, and the public body equalizes rates among similarly situated classes of customers within ten (10) years of the date of the rate study; or

Within one (1) year of the creation or expansion of the public body, an independent expert completes an engineering study of the related infrastructure located within the jurisdiction of each participating public agency that identifies improvements needed to create a uniform infrastructure quality throughout the jurisdictions, rate differentials among otherwise similarly situated classes of customers are reasonably calculated to recover from customers located in the respective jurisdictions in which the improvements are made the costs incurred in making the improvements in such jurisdictions, and the public body equalizes rates among similarly situated classes of customers within ten (10) years after the date of the engineering study.

The inability of a public body to rely upon either safe harbor defense set out in subdivisions (c)(3)(A) and (B) of this section shall not create any implication that the public body has failed to equalize any differentials in rates among similarly situated classes of customers within a reasonable period of time after its creation or expansion.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); added (a)(2); deleted “water” preceding “rates” in (c)(2) and (d); substituted “related infrastructure” for “water system infrastructure” in (c)(3)(B); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a); and inserted “wastewater service, storm water service” in (c)(1).

Extend its distribution system and provide water, wastewater service, storm water service, and other goods and services to any consumer located outside the jurisdictions of the public body's participating public agencies; and

Sell surplus water to any municipality, improvement district, or other entity that sells and distributes water subject to regulation of the Department of Health, whether the municipality, improvement district, or other entity is located within or outside the jurisdictions of the public body's participating agencies.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “entity that sells and distributes water subject to regulation of the Department of Health, whether the municipality, improvement district, or other entity” for “person engaged in the business of selling and distributing water to consumers, whether the municipality, improvement district, or other person” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment inserted “wastewater service, storm water service, and other goods”in (a)(1) and (b); and, in (b), deleted “extensions of” preceding “services” and made stylistic changes.

The bonds may:

Be in such form and denominations;

Have such date or dates;

Be stated to mature at such time or times;

Bear interest payable at such times and at such rate or rates;

Be payable at such places within or without the state;

Be subject to such terms of redemption in advance of maturity at such prices; and

Contain such terms and conditions,

all as the board of commissioners shall determine.

The bonds shall have all the qualities of and shall be deemed to be negotiable instruments under the laws of the State of Arkansas, subject to provisions as to registration as set forth in this subsection.

The authorizing resolution may contain any other terms, covenants, and conditions that the board of commissioners deems reasonable and desirable, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the:

Maintenance of various funds and reserves;

Nature and extent of any security for payment of the bonds;

Custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds;

Collection and disposition of revenues;

Investing for authorized purposes; and

Rights, duties, and obligations of the public body and the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

(1)The authorizing resolution may provide for the execution of a trust indenture between the public body and any financial institution within or without the State of Arkansas.

Maintenance of various funds and reserves;

Nature and extent of any security for the payment of the bonds;

Custody and application of the proceeds of the bonds;

Collection and disposition of revenues;

Investing and reinvesting of any moneys during periods not needed for authorized purposes; and

Rights, duties, and obligations of the public body and the holders and registered owners of the bonds.

(1)Any authorizing resolution and trust indenture relating to the issuance and security of the bonds shall constitute a contract between the public body and holders and registered owners of the bonds.

The resolution shall fix the minimum rate or rates for water or other services provided by the consolidated waterworks system to be collected before the payment of all of the bonds, with exceptions as may be provided in the resolution, and shall pledge the revenues derived from the consolidated waterworks system or any specified portion of the consolidated waterworks system for the purpose of paying the bonds and interest.

The rates to be charged for the water or other services of the consolidated waterworks system or the specified portion of the consolidated waterworks system with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds shall be sufficient to provide:

For the payment of all principal of and interest on all bonds as and when due;

For the operation and maintenance of the consolidated waterworks system or the specified portion of the consolidated waterworks system with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds; and

An adequate depreciation account for the consolidated waterworks system or the specified portion of the consolidated waterworks system with revenues pledged to the payment of the bonds.

The proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds shall be used solely for the purpose of:

Making betterments, improvements, and extensions to the consolidated waterworks system owned and operated by the public body;

Paying interest on the bonds during the period of construction of the betterments, improvements, and extensions;

Establishing any necessary reserves for the bonds;

Paying the costs of issuing the bonds; and

Paying any other costs and expenditures of whatever nature incidental to the accomplishment of the betterments, improvements, and extensions.

The terms “betterments”, “improvements”, and “extensions” include all real property, personal property, buildings, structures, improvements, equipment, and facilities.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be payable solely from revenues derived from the consolidated waterworks system or any specified portion of the consolidated waterworks system.

The bonds shall not in any event constitute an indebtedness of, nor pledge the faith and credit of, the State of Arkansas or the participating public agencies within the meaning of any constitutional provisions or limitations.

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it:

Is issued under the provisions of this subchapter;

Does not constitute an indebtedness of the State of Arkansas or the participating public agencies within any constitutional provisions or limitations; and

Is not backed by the full faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or the participating public agencies.

The bonds and the interest thereon shall be exempt from all taxation, state, county, and municipal. This exemption includes income taxation and inheritance taxation.

The bonds may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and upon such terms as the board of commissioners shall determine to be reasonable and expedient for effectuating the purposes of the public body.

The bonds may be sold at a price the board of commissioners may accept, including sale at discount.

The bonds shall be executed by manual or facsimile signature of the chair of the board of commissioners and the manual or facsimile signature of the secretary of the board of commissioners or any other officer of the public body authorized to do so by resolution of the board of commissioners.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on the bonds shall cease to be the officers before delivery of the bonds, their signatures nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes.

Each bond shall be impressed or imprinted with the seal of the public body.

Prior to a proposed issuance of revenue bonds by a public body, the public body shall publish one (1) time in a newspaper of general circulation in the participating public agencies:

Notice of the proposed issuance of bonds;

The maximum principal amount of bonds contemplated to be sold;

A general description of the project contemplated to be financed or refinanced with bond proceeds; and

The date, time, and location of a public meeting at which members of the public may obtain further information regarding the bonds and the project.

Notice under subdivision (j)(1)(A) of this section shall be published at least ten (10) days prior to the date of the hearing described in subdivision (j)(1)(A)(iv) of this section.

The chief executive officer of the public body or his or her designee shall be responsible for conducting the hearing and shall request all public comments that might pertain to the proposed issuance of bonds by the public body.

Upon compliance with the provisions of this section, other notice, hearing, or approval by the public body, any participating public agency or any governmental unit shall not be required as a condition to the issuance by a public body of its contemplated bonds or any interim financing with respect thereto.

The provisions of the Revenue Bond Act of 1987, § 19-9-601 et seq., do not apply to this section and revenue bonds or interim financing issued hereunder.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (j)(3)(A) of this section, the participating public agencies that have entered into the interlocal agreement forming the public body may, in the interlocal agreement, impose additional procedural requirements as a precedent for the issuance of revenue bonds by a public body, and if that is the case, the public body shall comply with those requirements prior to the issuance of the bonds and any interim financing.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (a), inserted “acquire” and “or equip”; inserted “or other services provided by the consolidated water system” in (e)(1); inserted “water or other” in the introductory language of (e)(2); and added (j).

The 2019 amendment, in (e)(1), substituted “waterworks” for “water”, substituted “before” for “prior to” and deleted “thereon” following “interest”; and rewrote (f)(2).

The payment of the principal of bonds issued under this subchapter and the interest thereon may be secured by a lien on and security interest in the consolidated waterworks system or any specified portion of the consolidated waterworks system.

It shall not be necessary to the perfection of the lien and pledge for such purposes that the trustee in connection with the bond issue or the holders of the bonds take possession of the collateral security.

Subject to whatever restrictions may be contained in the resolution or indenture governing the bonds, any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter may enforce either at law or in equity the mortgage lien and may compel by proper suit the performance of the duties of the officers of the issuing public body set forth in this subchapter.

If there be default in the payment of the principal of or interest on any of the bonds, any court having jurisdiction in any proper action may appoint a receiver to administer the consolidated waterworks system or the specified portion of the consolidated waterworks system pledged to the payment of the bonds on behalf of the public body, with power to charge and collect rates sufficient to provide for the payment of the bonds and the interest thereon and for the payment of the operating expenses and to apply the income and revenues in conformity with this subchapter and the resolution or indenture providing for the issuance of the bonds.

Bonds may be issued for the purpose of refunding any obligations issued under this subchapter or otherwise. The refunding bonds may be combined with bonds issued under the provisions of § 25-20-310 into a single issue.

When bonds are issued under this section for refunding purposes, the bonds may either be sold or delivered in exchange for the outstanding obligations. If sold, the proceeds may be either applied to the payment of the obligations refunded or deposited in escrow for the retirement thereof either at maturity or upon any authorized redemption date.

(1)All bonds issued under this section shall in all respects be authorized, issued, and secured in the manner provided for other bonds issued under this subchapter and shall have all the attributes of such bonds.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1; 2017, No. 711, § 3; 2019, No. 613, § 2.

25-20-307. Operation of consolidated waterworks system — Definition.

“Consolidated waterworks system” means and includes real property, personal property, buildings, structures, improvements, equipment, and facilities of a system or systems of a public body formed under this subchapter.

(1)Unless the interlocal agreement provides otherwise, a public body created under this subchapter shall have full authority to construct, own, manage, operate, finance, improve, extend, acquire, reconstruct, equip, sell, lease, contract concerning, deal in, dispose of, and maintain a consolidated waterworks system.

The assets of the public body may be located inside and outside the jurisdictions of the public body's participating public agencies.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1; 2017, No. 711, §§ 4-7; 2019, No. 613, §§ 3, 4.

25-20-308. Out-of-area sales and services.

Any public body created under this subchapter may:

Sales of water, wastewater service, storm water service, and other goods and services authorized under this section may be made at rates and on other terms as the board of commissioners deems just and reasonable, and the rates need not be the same as the rates charged customers within the jurisdictions of the public body's participating public agencies.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1; 2017, No. 711, § 8; 2019, No. 613, § 5.

25-20-309. Eminent domain.

Any public body created under this subchapter may acquire by the exercise of the power of eminent domain any real property that it may deem necessary for its purposes, in the manner prescribed in §18-15-301 et seq. or §18-15-401 et seq., or in the manner provided by any other statutory provisions under which one (1) of the public body's participating public agencies may exercise a power of eminent domain.

In exercising the power of eminent domain, the public body shall have the right by its agents or employees to peacefully enter upon any lands, structures, or rights-of-way to make surveys, tests, and measurements thereon, but is liable for any damage that may result by reason of its acts.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-310. Improvements — Financing with bonds.

Whenever any public body created under this subchapter shall own or operate a consolidated waterworks system and shall desire to acquire, construct, or equip improvements, betterments, and extensions thereto, it may issue revenue bonds under the provisions of this section to pay for them. The procedure for issuance of bonds shall be as provided in this section.

(1)Bonds issued in accordance with this section shall be authorized by resolution of the board of commissioners.

The bonds may be issued as registered bonds and may be exchangeable for bonds of another denomination or in another form.

The trust indenture may contain any terms, covenants, and conditions that are deemed desirable by the board of commissioners, including, without limitation, those pertaining to the:

The contract and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein, shall be promptly performed in strict compliance with the terms and provisions of the contract, and the covenants, agreements, and obligations of the public body may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceeding at law or in equity.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1; 2017, No. 711, §§ 9-11; 2019, No. 613, § 6.

25-20-311. Lien in favor of bondholders.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-312. Refunding bonds.

The resolution or indenture under which the refunding bonds are issued may provide that any of the refunding bonds shall have the same priority of lien on the revenues pledged for their payment as was enjoyed by the obligations refunded thereby.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-313. Securing deposit of public funds.

Bonds issued under this subchapter shall be eligible to secure the deposit of public funds.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-314. No personal liability.

No commissioner or officer of the public body shall be liable personally for any reason arising from the issuance of bonds under this subchapter unless he or she shall have acted with a corrupt intent.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-315. Recreational use of property.

Any public body created under this subchapter shall have the same powers as a municipally owned waterworks system to use its properties for recreational purposes, subject to any restrictions applying to a municipally owned waterworks system, as set forth in §14-234-401 et seq. Consequently, the board of commissioners of a public body created under this subchapter shall be an “operating authority” as defined in §14-234-401, and any summons issued under § 14-234-401 et seq. shall be returnable to the municipal court of any municipality that is a participating public agency or is a municipality located within the jurisdiction of any participating public agency.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-316. Zoning exemption.

Any public body maintaining facilities in an area zoned subsequent to the construction of the facilities may add to, alter, expand, or change the facilities upon that land, or upon lands immediately adjacent thereto, without regard to the zoning regulation for the area, if the board of commissioners deems the action necessary for the proper operation of its consolidated waterworks system.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-317. Tax exempt status of property owned and income.

Each public body created under this subchapter will be performing functions and will be a public instrumentality of the participating public agencies. Accordingly, all properties at any time owned by the public body, and the income therefrom, shall be exempt from all taxation in the state.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-318. Immunity.

This subchapter does not abrogate or in any other manner affect the immunity of the participating public agencies. The immunity shall extend also to any public body created under this subchapter and to each commissioner, officer, and employee thereof.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-319. Franchise fees.

Any participating public agency that is an Arkansas municipality or county, acting by ordinance or resolution of its governing body, may require a public body created under this subchapter to pay a reasonable franchise fee, upon which the public body may be permitted to occupy the streets, highways, or other public places within the jurisdiction of the public agency. The ordinance or resolution shall be deemed prima facie reasonable, provided that no franchise fee shall exceed ten percent (10%) of the public body's operating revenues that are attributable to gross income from water sales within the public agency's jurisdiction, unless agreed to by the public body or approved by the voters of the public agency.

A participating public agency shall not require a public body created under this subchapter to pay a franchise fee under authority of other law.

Any franchise fees charged under authority of this section shall be in addition to payments in lieu of taxes permitted by this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment rewrote (b).

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “one hundred eighty (180)” for “ninety (90)” in (a).

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1; 2019, No. 241, § 3.

25-20-320. Payments in lieu of taxes.

(1)A public body created under this subchapter shall make annual payments to the general fund of each participating public agency that is an Arkansas municipality or county, in lieu of taxes, in return for police, fire, and health protection and in return for administrative and other services furnished by the public agency. The payments shall be an operation and maintenance expense of the public body.

In each calendar year the payments shall equal the amount the public agency would have received from the public body as real property taxes for the preceding calendar year, if the public body's real property located in the public agency's jurisdiction, whether owned or leased by the public body, had been privately owned and subject to tax by the public agency. For purposes of this computation, the public body's real property shall be deemed to have an assessed value equal to twenty percent (20%) of book value as reflected by the public body's usual accounting procedures.

Payments in lieu of taxes made under authority of this section shall be in addition to any franchise fees permitted by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-321. Annual report and audit.

Within the first one hundred eighty (180) days of each calendar year, each public body created under this subchapter shall make a written report to the governing bodies of the participating public agencies concerning its activities for the preceding calendar year.

Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operation during the year, including, without limitation, an audit of the public body's revenues and expenses performed by an independent certified public accountant.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1; 2017, No. 711, § 12.

25-20-322. Provisions supplemental and controlling.

This subchapter shall be deemed to provide an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized hereby and shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-323. Construction.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish its intent and purposes and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of its purposes, and to this end it shall not be necessary to comply with the provisions of other laws relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds authorized by this subchapter. This subchapter shall be construed as an additional and alternative method for the issuance and sale of bonds.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 982, § 1.

25-20-324. Interim financing.

If the issuance of revenue bonds is authorized by resolution of the board of commissioners, any public body created under this subchapter is authorized to obtain interim financing pending the delivery of all or any part of the bonds from such sources and upon such terms as the board of commissioners of the public body shall determine.

As evidence of any indebtedness so incurred, the public body may execute and deliver its promissory note or notes and pledge to the payment thereof any revenues authorized by this subchapter to be pledged to revenue bonds and the proceeds of the revenue bonds when issued.

The public body may secure the notes in the same manner as revenue bonds issued under this subchapter.

The notes shall not in any event constitute an indebtedness of, nor pledge the faith and credit of, the State of Arkansas or the participating public agencies of the public body within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory limitation.

The public body may use, as distinguished from pledge, any available revenues to pay or to apply to the payment of the principal of and interest on the notes and may use the proceeds of revenue bonds, either alone or with other available revenues, to pay the principal and interest on the notes.

The notes may bear such date or dates, may mature at such time or times, not exceeding thirty-six (36) months from their respective dates, may bear interest at such rate or rates, may be in such form, may be executed in such manner, may be payable at such place or places, may contain such provisions for prepayment prior to maturity and may contain such other terms, covenants, and conditions as the resolution may provide, not inconsistent with the provisions of this subchapter pertaining to revenue bonds.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 711, § 13.

Subchapter 4

— Arkansas Municipal Electric Utility Interlocal Cooperation Act of 2003

25-20-401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Municipal Electric Utility Interlocal Cooperation Act of 2003”.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Authority” means a municipal electric consolidated authority created pursuant to this subchapter;

“Electric project” means any:

Plant, works, system, or facilities and real and personal property of any nature associated therewith, together with all parts thereof and appurtenances thereto, that are used or useful in the generation, transmission, coordination, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of electric capacity and energy, and provision of ancillary services, including facilities and property for the acquisition, extraction, conversion, transportation, storage, reprocessing, or disposal of fuel and other materials of any kind for such purposes or that may be necessary or advisable for the proper and efficient operation of the authority's facilities;

Interest in or right to the use, services, or electric capacity and energy of any such plant, works, system, or facilities;

Study to determine the feasibility or costs of any of the foregoing, including, but not limited to, engineering, legal, financial, and other services necessary to determine the legality and financial and engineering feasibility of any electric project; and

Contract or agreement associated with generation, transmission, coordination, purchase, sale, exchange, or interchange of electric capacity and energy or ancillary services;

“Electric transmission system” and “electric transmission facility” mean electric utility properties and facilities necessary for transmitting electricity at sixty-nine kilovolts (69 kV) phase-to-phase or higher and not for service to a directly tapped, retail, end-use customer or customers;

“Governing body of a municipal electric utility” means the city council, board of directors, improvement district commissioners, or other elected or appointed authority having the rate-making and debt-issuance authority for the municipal electric utility;

“Municipality” means any city of the first class or city of the second class incorporated under the laws of the State of Arkansas or any commission or agency thereof, including any municipally owned or municipally controlled corporation, any improvement district, consolidated public or municipal utility system improvement district, or nonprofit corporation lessee of such an entity;

“Municipal electric utility” means any electric generation, transmission, or distribution system owned or operated on July 16, 2003, by any city of the first class, city of the second class, or a town incorporated under the laws of the State of Arkansas or any commission, department, division, or agency thereof, including any municipally owned or municipally controlled corporation, improvement district, consolidated public or municipal utility system improvement district, or nonprofit corporation lessee of such an entity;

“Person” means any natural person, firm, corporation, electric cooperative corporation, energy service provider, nonprofit corporation, association, or improvement district; and

“Public utility” means any person or entity engaged in the generation or sale of electric power and energy that is subject to regulation by the Arkansas Public Service Commission.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-403. Creation.

The governing bodies of any two (2) or more municipal electric utilities entering into an interlocal agreement under the Interlocal Cooperation Act, § 25-20-101 et seq., are authorized to create an authority as a separate legal entity for the purposes set forth in this subchapter.

For the purposes of this section, a rural electric cooperative corporation that is not a member of a generation or transmission cooperative or a municipal electric utility system in another state may join in the formation of an authority.

An authority created under this subchapter shall be referenced as an Arkansas Municipal Electric Utility Consolidated Authority # 1, #2, #3, and so forth as determined by the Secretary of State.

The governing body of a municipal electric utility wishing to create an authority under this subchapter shall approve by ordinance or resolution or otherwise pursuant to law an interlocal agreement specifying the matters set forth in § 25-20-104.

An application shall be filed with the Secretary of State.

Review by the Secretary of State as contemplated by this section shall be in addition to those filings required by §§ 25-20-104(f) and 25-20-105(a).

An interlocal agreement shall:

Specify any limitations on the exercise of the authority's powers, including such matters, if any, as to which the governing bodies of the municipal electric utilities reserve rights to approve, disapprove, or otherwise participate in any exercise of the authority's powers;

Provide for reasonable payments in lieu of taxes or other payments by the authority to the participating governing bodies of the municipal electric utilities, as the governing bodies may deem appropriate;

Specify the:

Number of commissioners of the authority;

Terms of office of the commissioners;

Manner of appointing or electing the commissioners;

Residency requirements applicable to commissioners; and

Voting rights of each commissioner. The voting rights may vary by commissioner; and

Set forth other matters not inconsistent with this subchapter with respect to the creation and operation of the authority as the governing bodies of the municipal electric utilities may deem necessary or appropriate.

An application to create an authority under this subchapter shall then be prepared, setting forth:

A request that an authority be created under this subchapter;

The proposed name for the authority;

The names of the participating governing bodies of municipal electric utilities;

The number of commissioners of the authority;

The manner in which commissioners of the authority will be appointed or elected and the residency requirements applicable to commissioners;

The voting rights of each commissioner;

Special procedures for amending the certificate of incorporation, if any; and

Other matters not inconsistent with this subchapter with respect to the creation and operation of the authority as the governing bodies of the municipal electric utilities may deem necessary or appropriate.

The application shall be signed on behalf of each governing body of municipal electric utilities by an authorized official thereof.

In addition to the filing requirements contained in §§ 25-20-104(f) and 25-20-105(a), the Secretary of State shall examine the application and, if the Secretary of State finds that the name proposed for the authority is not identical with that of any other corporation, agency, or instrumentality of the State of Arkansas, so nearly similar as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, or otherwise deceptively misleading, the Secretary of State shall:

Receive and file the application;

Record the application in an appropriate book of record in his or her office;

Make and issue a certificate of incorporation under the seal of the State of Arkansas setting forth the name of the authority and the names of the participating municipal electric utilities; and

Record the certificate in an appropriate book of record in his or her office.

A copy of the certificate of incorporation certified by the Secretary of State shall be admissible in evidence in any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforcement of or relating to any contract of the authority and shall be conclusive proof of the filing and contents of the certificate and the effective creation of the authority, absent fraud in the premises being established.

Any certificate of incorporation issued by the Secretary of State under this subchapter may be amended from time to time:

In the manner provided in the certificate of incorporation then existing; or

If the certificate of incorporation does not specify a procedure for its amendment, with the consent of a majority of the commissioners of the authority who are entitled to vote.

The amendment shall be signed by an officer or other authorized person of the authority who shall certify that the certificate of incorporation has been amended in accordance with the procedures of this subchapter and, as applicable, in the manner prescribed in the then-existing certificate of incorporation.

Upon filing the amendment with the Secretary of State in the manner provided in this section, the Secretary of State shall make and issue an amendment to the certificate of incorporation.

All powers of an authority created under this subchapter shall be exercised by, or under the authority of, and the business and affairs of the authority managed under the direction of, its board of commissioners, subject to any limitation set forth in the authority's interlocal agreement.

The duties of the board shall be stated in the interlocal agreement and may include, but shall not be limited to:

Adopting such rules and bylaws as the board may deem necessary and expedient for the proper ownership and operation of its electric projects. The rules and bylaws may be altered, changed, or amended at the board's discretion; and

Performing other duties as set forth in the interlocal agreement.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment deleted “regulations” following “rules” twice in (b)(3).

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1.

25-20-404. Powers and duties of board of commissioners.

Appointing a chief executive officer who shall not be a member of the board and setting compensation and other terms of employment for the chief executive officer;

Approving all budgets of the authority;

History.

Acts 2003, No. 366, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2930.